Hawaii statutes.
[§27-41.1] Definitions. For
purposes of this part:

"Data" means final versions of
statistical or factual information:

(1) In alphanumeric form reflected in a list, table,
graph, chart, or other nonnarrative form, that can be digitally transmitted or
processed; and

(2) Regularly created or maintained by or on behalf
of and owned by an executive branch department that records a measurement,
transaction, or determination related to the mission of that executive branch
department.

"Data set" means a named collection
of related records on an electronic storage device, with the collection
containing individual data units organized or formatted in a specific and
prescribed way, often in tabular form, and accessed by a specific access method
that is based on the data set organization; provided that a data set shall not
include any data that is protected from disclosure under applicable federal or
state law, or contract, or data that is proprietary. [L 2013, c 263, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next